Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1414.05
Nebraska
Law Enforcement Training Center Fund; proceeds; how expended.

The proceeds of the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center
Fund shall
be expended by the commission, as and when appropriated
by the Legislature, to be used for the costs and payments to be made by the
State of Nebraska to the city of Grand Island for the use by the state of
such building or facility or portion thereof and
equipping the same.

Laws 1978, LB 877, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB817, § 12.